Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 403.19, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. That portion of the taxes each year in excess of such amount shall be allocated to and when collected be paid into a special fund of the municipality to pay the principal of and interest on loans, moneys advanced to, or indebtedness, whether funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, including bonds issued under the authority of section 403.9, subsection 1 , incurred by the municipality to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, an urban renewal project within the area, and to provide assistance for low and moderate income family housing as provided in section 403.22 . However, except as provided in paragraph âbâ , taxes for the regular and voter-approved physical plant and equipment levy of a school district imposed pursuant to section 298.2 and taxes for the instructional support program of a school district imposed pursuant to section 257.19 , taxes for the payment of bonds and interest of each taxing district, taxes for emergency medical services imposed pursuant to chapter 357F, 357G, or 422D, and taxes imposed under section 346.27, subsection 22 , related to joint Senate File 2496, p. 2 county-city buildings shall be collected against all taxable property within the taxing district without limitation by the provisions of this subsection . Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2026. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2496, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor